apertium-ga-gd.gd.dix
    <pardef n="tra/ng__adj">
      <e><p><l>ng</l><r>ng<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>inge</l><r>ng<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ing</l><r>ng<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nga</l><r>ng<s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="coinn/eal__n">
      <e><p><l>eal</l><r>eal<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>le</l><r>eal<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lean</l><r>eal<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lean</l><r>eal<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="seana/ir__n">
      <e><p><l>ir</l><r>ir<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>r</l><r>ir<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>irean</l><r>ir<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>irean</l><r>ir<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="sge/ap__n">
      <e><p><l>ap</l><r>ap<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ip</l><r>ap<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>apan</l><r>ap<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>apan</l><r>ap<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="beachda/ich__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ichte</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichte</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichte</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichte</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>chadh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>chaidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ich</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichibh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ich</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="làidr/ich__vblex">
      <e><p><l>ichte</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichte</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichte</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichte</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eachadh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eachaidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ich</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ich</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ich</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ich</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ich</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ich</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>icheadh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>icheadh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>icheadh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>icheadh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ich</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ich</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ich</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ich</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ich</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ich</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ich</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>icheadh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>icheadh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>icheadh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>icheadh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>icheamaid</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichinn</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichidh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ichibh</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ich</l><r>ich<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     

    <e lm="coinneal"><par n="initial-c"/><i>oinn</i><par n="coinn/eal__n"/></e>
    <e lm="seanair"><par n="initial-s"/><i>eana</i><par n="seana/ir__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sgeap"><par n="initial-s"/><i>ge</i><par n="sge/ap__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sinn-seanair"><par n="initial-s"/><i>inn-seana</i><par n="seana/ir__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tuirneap"><par n="initial-t"/><i>uirne</i><par n="sge/ap__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trang"><i>tra</i><par n="tra/ng__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="beachdaich"><i>beachda</i><par n="beachda/ich__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="làidrich"><i>làidr</i><par n="làidr/ich__vblex"/></e>
